Louisiana, session 2026, SB268.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4081.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4081.2. Lead service line replacement; right-of-entry
A. A municipality may adopt an ordinance that allows the municipality
or municipal water system, or any agent thereof, to enter a property within the
municipality to perform a lead service line replacement, provided that the
municipality provides the owner and any residents of the property with notice
at least seven days before entering the property, unless in the case of an
emergency as determined by the municipality or municipal water system. A
municipality may not enter into a property that is not directly related to
performing a lead service line replacement.
B. For the purposes of this Section, notice to the owner and any residents
of the property shall include an attempt to inform the owner and any residents,
in person, of the date and time of the lead service line replacement, and if the
owner or a resident is unable to be reached in person, the municipality shall
send, by certified mail, a letter to the owner and any residents or post a written
notice in a prominent location on the property which shall include:
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 268 ENROLLED
(1) The scheduled date and time of the lead service line replacement and
who will be performing the replacement.
(2) The likely extent of water service disruption.
(3) Nearby locations where the municipality or a public water system is
distributing supplementary drinking water, if any.
(4) Any remedies that the municipality shall take if the municipality or
municipal water system, or an agent thereof, is unable to access the property.
C. In addition to the notice requirements of Subsection B of this Section,
a municipality shall send, by certified mail, a letter to the owner after the
completion of the replacement stating the approximate time that the
replacement occurred, and providing a brief summary of the work performed.
D. As used in this Section:
(1) "Municipal water system" means a municipal utilities authority,
water district, waterworks, water commission, joint meeting or any other
political subdivision of the state authorized, pursuant to law, to operate or
maintain a public water system or to construct, rehabilitate, operate, or
maintain water supply facilities or otherwise provide water for human
consumption.
(2) "Service line" means the pipe, tubing, and fittings connecting a
municipal water main to a building or structure, and also includes the water
meter for the property.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.